Washington statutes.
RCW 33.24.007

"Real property" defined.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, "real property" means improved or unimproved real estate and includes leasehold interests in improved or unimproved real estate and includes manufactured housing whether temporarily, semipermanently, or permanently attached to land and mobile homes and manufactured homes whose title has been eliminated under chapter 65.20 RCW.

[ 1989 c 343 s 23; 1982 c 3 s 49.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 343: See RCW 65.20.950.

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.